Indiana, session 2026, HB1393.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 16-18-2-69.1 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 69.1. "Consumer", for purposes
of IC 16-51-2, has the meaning set forth in IC 16-51-2-1.
SECTION 2. IC 16-18-2-160.2 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 160.2. "Health care debt", for
purposes of IC 16-51-2, has the meaning set forth in IC 16-51-2-2.
SECTION 3. IC 16-18-2-163, AS AMENDED BY
P.L.179-2022(ss), SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 163. (a) Except as
provided in subsection (c), "health care provider", for purposes of
IC 16-21 and IC 16-41, means any of the following:
(1) An individual, a partnership, a corporation, a professional
corporation, a facility, or an institution licensed or legally
authorized by this state to provide health care or professional
services as a licensed physician, a psychiatric hospital, a hospital,
2026 IN 1393—LS 6009/DI 92


a health facility, an emergency ambulance service (IC 16-31-3),
a dentist, a registered or licensed practical nurse, a midwife, an
optometrist, a pharmacist, a podiatrist, a chiropractor, a physical
therapist, a respiratory care practitioner, an occupational therapist,
a psychologist, a paramedic, an emergency medical technician, an
advanced emergency medical technician, an athletic trainer, or a
person who is an officer, employee, or agent of the individual,
partnership, corporation, professional corporation, facility, or
institution acting in the course and scope of the person's
employment.
(2) A college, university, or junior college that provides health
care to a student, a faculty member, or an employee, and the
governing board or a person who is an officer, employee, or agent
of the college, university, or junior college acting in the course
and scope of the person's employment.
(3) A blood bank, community mental health center, community
intellectual disability center, community health center, or migrant
health center.
(4) A home health agency (as defined in IC 16-27-1-2).
(5) A health maintenance organization (as defined in
IC 27-13-1-19).
(6) A health care organization whose members, shareholders, or
partners are health care providers under subdivision (1).
(7) A corporation, partnership, or professional corporation not
otherwise qualified under this subsection that:
(A) provides health care as one (1) of the corporation's,
partnership's, or professional corporation's functions;
(B) is organized or registered under state law; and
(C) is determined to be eligible for coverage as a health care
provider under IC 34-18 for the corporation's, partnership's, or
professional corporation's health care function.
Coverage for a health care provider qualified under this subdivision is
limited to the health care provider's health care functions and does not
extend to other causes of action.
(b) "Health care provider", for purposes of IC 16-35, has the
meaning set forth in subsection (a). However, for purposes of IC 16-35,
the term also includes a health facility (as defined in section 167 of this
chapter).
(c) "Health care provider", for purposes of IC 16-32-5, IC 16-36-5,
IC 16-36-6, and IC 16-41-10 means an individual licensed or
authorized by this state to provide health care or professional services
as:
2026 IN 1393—LS 6009/DI 92


(1) a licensed physician;
(2) a registered nurse;
(3) a licensed practical nurse;
(4) an advanced practice registered nurse;
(5) a certified nurse midwife;
(6) a paramedic;
(7) an emergency medical technician;
(8) an advanced emergency medical technician;
(9) an emergency medical responder, as defined by section 109.8
of this chapter;
(10) a licensed dentist;
(11) a home health aide, as defined by section 174 of this chapter;
or
(12) a licensed physician assistant.
The term includes an individual who is an employee or agent of a
health care provider acting in the course and scope of the individual's
employment.
(d) "Health care provider", for purposes of IC 16-36-7, has the
meaning set forth in IC 16-36-7-12.
(e) "Health care provider", for purposes of IC 16-40-4, means any
of the following:
(1) An individual, a partnership, a corporation, a professional
corporation, a facility, or an institution licensed or authorized by
the state to provide health care or professional services as a
licensed physician, a psychiatric hospital, a hospital, a health
facility, an emergency ambulance service (IC 16-31-3), an
ambulatory outpatient surgical center, a dentist, an optometrist, a
pharmacist, a podiatrist, a chiropractor, a psychologist, or a
person who is an officer, employee, or agent of the individual,
partnership, corporation, professional corporation, facility, or
institution acting in the course and scope of the person's
employment.
(2) A blood bank, laboratory, community mental health center,
community intellectual disability center, community health
center, or migrant health center.
(3) A home health agency (as defined in IC 16-27-1-2).
(4) A health maintenance organization (as defined in
IC 27-13-1-19).
(5) A health care organization whose members, shareholders, or
partners are health care providers under subdivision (1).
(6) A corporation, partnership, or professional corporation not
otherwise specified in this subsection that:
2026 IN 1393—LS 6009/DI 92


(A) provides health care as one (1) of the corporation's,
partnership's, or professional corporation's functions;
(B) is organized or registered under state law; and
(C) is determined to be eligible for coverage as a health care
provider under IC 34-18 for the corporation's, partnership's, or
professional corporation's health care function.
(7) A person that is designated to maintain the records of a person
described in subdivisions (1) through (6).
(f) "Health care provider", for purposes of IC 16-45-4, has the
meaning set forth in 47 CFR 54.601(a).
(g) "Health care provider", for purposes of IC 16-51-2, has the
meaning set forth in IC 16-51-2-3.
SECTION 4. IC 16-18-2-244.7 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 244.7. "Necessary services", for
purposes of IC 16-51-2, has the meaning set forth in IC 16-51-2-4.
SECTION 5. IC 16-51-2 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE AS
A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]:
Chapter 2. Health Care Debt: Duty to Provide Necessary
Services
Sec. 1. (a) As used in this chapter, "consumer" means an
individual whose principal residence is in Indiana.
(b) The term includes an individual described in subsection (a)
who is legally responsible for, or legally required or authorized to
act on behalf of, an individual who is:
(1) less than eighteen (18) years of age; or
(2) an incapacitated person (as defined in IC 29-3-1-7.5).
Sec. 2. (a) As used in this chapter, "health care debt" means an
obligation or an alleged obligation of a consumer to pay an amount
related to the receipt of health care services, products, or devices
provided by a health care provider to:
(1) the consumer; or
(2) an individual described in section 1(b)(1) or 1(b)(2) of this
chapter with respect to whom the consumer is:
(A) legally responsible; or
(B) legally required or authorized to act.
(b) The term does not include debt charged to a credit card
unless the credit card is issued under:
(1) an open-end plan; or
(2) a closed-end plan;
offered specifically for the payment of health care services,
2026 IN 1393—LS 6009/DI 92


products, or devices provided to an individual.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "health care provider" means:
(1) a person listed in IC 16-39-7-1(a)(1) through
IC 16-39-7-1(a)(13); or
(2) a provider of ambulance services (as defined in
IC 16-18-2-13.4).
Sec. 4. As used in this chapter, "necessary services", with
respect to an individual, means services that are:
(1) provided by a health care provider to the individual; and
(2) necessary or appropriate to prevent or treat:
(A) serious permanent disfigurement;
(B) serious temporary disfigurement;
(C) permanent or protracted loss or impairment of the
function of a bodily part or organ;
(D) loss of consciousness; or
(E) death.
Sec. 5. A health care provider may not refuse to provide
necessary services to:
(1) a consumer; or
(2) an individual described in section 1(b)(1) or 1(b)(2) of this
chapter with respect to whom a consumer is:
(A) legally responsible; or
(B) legally required or authorized to act;
solely on the basis of health care debt owed or alleged to be owed
by the consumer to the health care provider for health care
services, products, or devices provided by the health care provider
to the consumer or the individual described in subdivision (2).
Sec. 6. A person that violates section 5 of this chapter commits
a deceptive act that is actionable under IC 24-5-0.5 only by the
attorney general under IC 24-5-0.5-4(c).
2026 IN 1393—LS 6009/DI 92